Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PROPERTY TAX TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A property tax task force is established as provided under this section. The goals of the task force are to: new text end new text begin (1) investigate causes of property tax increases across counties, school districts, cities, and towns; and new text end new text begin (2) present options that would increase transparency regarding the budgets of local governments, including options for standardizing the information presented in the notices and meetings required under Minnesota Statutes, section 275.065. new text end new text begin (b) The Legislative Coordinating Commission shall facilitate the task force, provide administrative assistance, and convene the first meeting by July 15, 2026. Members of the task force may receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses as authorized by Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership and appointments. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must consist of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two state representatives, one appointed by each of the cochairs of the house of representatives Taxes Committee; new text end new text begin (2) two state senators, one appointed by the chair of the senate Taxes Committee and one appointed by the ranking minority member of the committee; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of revenue, or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) one county commissioner appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (5) one mayor appointed by the League of Minnesota Cities; and new text end new text begin (6) one school board member appointed by the Minnesota School Boards Association. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments and designations for members of the task force must be made by June 15, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must make advisory recommendations to the legislature on the goals outlined in subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must meet at regular intervals until November 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of revenue or their designee must chair the initial meeting and the task force must elect a chair at that initial meeting. The task force will meet at the call of the chair. Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D, does not apply to meetings of the task force. Meetings of the task force must be open to the public and the task force must provide notice of a meeting at least seven days before the meeting. A meeting of the task force occurs when a quorum is present. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The task force must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over property taxes no later than January 15, 2027. The report must contain the task force's advisory recommendations and any additional information the task force deems relevant. Legislative committees with jurisdiction over property taxes must hold a public hearing on the report during the regular legislative session in the year in which the report is submitted. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force established by this section expires upon submission of the report under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end